Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 39. Mississippi Civil Rights Museum Advisory Commission

§ 39-39-1.
Mississippi Civil Rights Museum Advisory Commission created; composition; responsibilities.

There is hereby established a Mississippi Civil Rights Museum Advisory Commission (commission) which shall be comprised of the following members:

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History;

The Director of Tourism of the Mississippi Development Authority;

The President of Tougaloo College, or his or her designee;

The President of Alcorn State University, or his or her designee;

The President of Jackson State University, or his or her designee;

The President of Mississippi Valley State University, or his or her designee;

The President of Rust College, or his or her designee;

The President of Mississippi University for Women, or his or her designee;

The President of Delta State University, or his or her designee;

The Chancellor of the University of Mississippi, or his or her designee;

The President of Mississippi State University, or his or her designee;

The President of the University of Southern Mississippi, or his or her designee;

Two (2) representatives of the Veterans of the Mississippi Civil Rights Movement, Inc.;

One (1) representative of the Fannie Lou Hamer Institute;

The Director of the William F. Winter Institute for Racial Reconciliation;

Four (4) appointees of the Governor, one (1) from each Mississippi Congressional District;

Two (2) appointees of the Lieutenant Governor from the state at large; and

Two (2) appointees of the Speaker of the House of Representatives from the state at large.

The chairman of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor.The commission shall meet on a date announced by the Governor and shall organize for business by adopting rules of procedure.The Mississippi Department of Archives and History shall provide administrative support to the commission and serve as fiscal agent for the commission.Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for attending meetings of the commission; however, members who are not public employees may be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in attending meetings of the commission from any funds available for that purpose.

The commission shall advise the Mississippi Department of Archives and History regarding matters relating to the Mississippi Civil Rights Museum.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 26, 2011.).